California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(B) (i) If the California Film Commission determines that the jobs ratio has been reduced by more than 10 percent for a qualified motion picture, the California Film Commission shall reduce the amount of credit allowed by an equal percentage, unless the qualified taxpayer demonstrates, and the California Film
 Commission determines, that reasonable cause exists for the jobs ratio reduction.

(ii) If the California Film Commission determines that the jobs ratio has been reduced by more than 20 percent for a qualified motion picture, the California Film Commission shall not accept an application described in subdivision (g) from that qualified taxpayer or any member of the qualified taxpayer’s controlled group for a period of not less than one year from the date of that determination, unless the qualified taxpayer demonstrates, and the California Film Commission determines, that reasonable cause exists for the jobs ratio reduction.

(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, “reasonable cause” means unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the qualified taxpayer, such as, but not limited to, the cancellation of a television series prior to the completion of the scheduled number of
 episodes or other similar circumstances as determined by the California Film Commission in regulations to be adopted pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) (1) (A) Subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the California Film Commission shall adopt rules and regulations to implement a pilot Career Pathways Training program including a fee to be paid by the qualified taxpayer, if the qualified taxpayer receives a credit under this section, to fund technical skills training to individuals from underserved communities for entry into film and television industry jobs. The California Film Commission shall (i) identify a not-for-profit fiscal agent with direct relationships to industry skills training programs to manage the funds; and (ii) engage labor-management jointly administered training programs with
 skills training focused on the entertainment industry to implement the program with California Film Commission approval and oversight. With regard to the Career Readiness requirement in Section 23695, the California Film Commission shall identify training and public service opportunities that may include, but not be limited to, hiring interns, public service announcements, and community outreach shall continue. The California Film Commission may prescribe rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including, subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) and clause (iv) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), and including any rules and regulations necessary to establish procedures, processes, requirements, application fee structure, and rules identified in or required to implement this section, including credit and logo requirements and credit allocation procedures over multiple fiscal years where the qualified taxpayer is producing a series of features that will
 be filmed concurrently.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, prior to preparing a notice of proposed action pursuant to Section 11346.4 of the Government Code and prior to making any revision to the proposed regulation other than a change that is nonsubstantial or solely grammatical in nature, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall first approve the proposed regulation or proposed change to a proposed regulation regarding allocating the credit pursuant to subdivision (i), computing the jobs ratio as described in subdivisions (d) and (g), and defining “reasonable cause” pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(2) (A) Implementation of this section for the 2020–21 fiscal year is deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare and,
 therefore, the California Film Commission is hereby authorized to adopt emergency regulations to implement this section during the 2020–21 fiscal year in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(B) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to require the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development to approve emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) The California Film Commission shall not be required to prepare an economic impact analysis pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) with regard to any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) If the qualified taxpayer fails to provide the copyright registration number as required in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the credit shall be disallowed and assessed and collected under Section 19051 until the procedures are satisfied.

(g) For purposes of this section, the California Film Commission shall do the following:

(1) Subject to the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2), on or after July 1, 2020, and before July 1, 2025, in two or more allocation periods per fiscal year, allocate tax credits to applicants.

(2) (A) Establish a procedure for applicants to file with the California Film Commission a written application, on a form jointly prescribed by the California Film
 Commission and the Franchise Tax Board for the allocation of the tax credit. The application shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(i) The budget for the motion picture production.

(ii) The number of production days.

(iii) A financing plan for the production.

(iv) The diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant, including, but not limited to, the ethnic and racial makeup of the individuals employed by the applicant during the production of the qualified motion picture, to the extent possible.

(v) All members of a combined reporting group, if known at the time of the application.

(vi) The
 amount of qualified wages the applicant expects to pay to qualified individuals.

(vii) The amount of tax credit the applicant computes the qualified motion picture will receive, applying the applicable credit percentages described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(viii) A statement establishing that the tax credit described in this section is a significant factor in the applicant’s choice of location for the qualified motion picture. The statement shall include information about whether the qualified motion picture is at risk of not being filmed or specify the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the qualified motion picture will be located in the absence of the tax credit. The statement shall be signed by an officer or executive of the applicant.

(ix) The applicant’s written policy against unlawful harassment,
 including, but not limited to, sexual harassment, which includes procedures for reporting and investigating harassment claims, a phone number for an individual who will be responsible for receiving harassment claims, and a statement that the company will not retaliate against an individual who reports harassment. The applicant shall also indicate how the policy will be distributed to employees and include a summary of education training resources, including the prohibition against, and prevention and correction of, sexual harassment and remedies available.

(x) The ethnic and racial makeup and gender of individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages as set forth in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b).

(xi) A summary of the applicant’s voluntary programs to increase the representation of minorities and women in the job classifications that
 are not included in qualified wages as set forth in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b) and information about how these programs are publicized to interested parties. The officer or executive referenced in clause (x) who is signing the statement shall provide additional information about these programs, if needed and upon request, to the California Film Commission.

(xii) Any other information deemed relevant by the California Film Commission or the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Establish criteria, consistent with the requirements of this section, for allocating tax credits.

(C) Determine and designate applicants who meet the requirements of this section.

(D) (i) For purposes of allocating the credit
 amounts subject to the categories described in subdivision (i) in any fiscal year, the California Film Commission shall do all of the following:

(ii) For each allocation date and for each category, list each applicant from highest to lowest according to the jobs ratio as computed by the California Film Commission.

(iii) Subject to the applicable credit percentage, allocate the credit to each applicant according to the highest jobs ratio, working down the list, until the credit amount is exhausted.

(iv) (I) Pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (e), the California Film Commission may increase the jobs ratio by up to 25 percent if a qualified motion picture increases economic activity in California according to criteria developed by the California Film Commission that would
 include, but not be limited to, such factors as, the amount of the production and postproduction spending in California, the utilization of scoring musicians in California, and other criteria measuring economic impact in California as determined by the California Film Commission.

(II) For qualified motion pictures that are described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (k), the jobs ratio shall be equal to the product of the jobs ratio calculated in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) and 133 percent.

(v) Notwithstanding any other law, any television series, relocating television series, or any new television series based on a pilot for a new television series that has been approved and issued a credit allocation by the California Film Commission under this section, including subdivision (k), Section 17053.98, including subdivision (k), or Section 17053.85, 17053.95,
 23685, or 23695 shall be issued a credit for each subsequent season, for the life of that television series whenever credits are allocated within a fiscal year. For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2025, the California Film Commission shall limit the amount of credits any recurring television series receives in a subsequent season to no more than the amount reserved in its prior fiscal year Credit Allocation Letter or Letters, or if no amounts were reserved in the prior fiscal year, the most immediate prior fiscal year in which a Credit Allocation Letter or Letters were received. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the California Film Commission shall limit the amount of credits any recurring television series receives in a subsequent season to no more than the recurring television allocation amount, as defined in paragraph (23) of subdivision (b) of Section 23698.1. In the event that insufficient tax credits are available to fund all recurring television series pursuant to this
 clause for any fiscal year or in the event the California Film Commission projects, in collaboration with the Department of Finance, that there will be insufficient tax credits available to fund all recurring television series in either of the subsequent two fiscal years, the California Film Commission shall make the following adjustments in the order given until the shortfall, or any projected shortfall for the two subsequent fiscal years, for recurring television series is eliminated:

(I) Notwithstanding clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit amounts allocated to the relocating television series category to recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall or projected shortfall is eliminated.

(II) Notwithstanding clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit amounts allocated to a new television series to recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall or projected shortfall is eliminated.

(III) Notwithstanding clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit allocations from the features category to the recurring television series category for that fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated.

(IV) Allocate up to 25 percent of total credit allocations that would otherwise be allocated in the 2024–25 fiscal year to recurring television series in the current fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated. Any amounts transferred for allocation in the current fiscal year shall be subtracted from the amount allowed
 to be allocated in the 2024–25 fiscal year as specified in subdivision (i). Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the credit allocations that are subtracted from 2024–25 shall not be certified until July 1, 2025, or later.

(V) The California Film Commission shall consult with the qualified taxpayers who are producing the recurring television series for purposes of negotiating a minimally impactful reduction in the amount of credits awarded to each recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated.

(E) Subject to the annual cap and the allocation credit amounts based on categories described in subdivision (i), allocate an aggregate amount of credits under this section and Section 17053.98, and allocate any carryover of unallocated or unused credits from prior years and Sections 17053.85, 17053.95, 23685, and 23695, and the amount of any credits reduced
 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(3) Certify tax credits allocated to qualified taxpayers.

(A) Establish a verification procedure to update the information in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The amounts of qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the applicant.

(ii) The diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant.

(iii) The ethnic and racial makeup and gender of individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages by clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b).

(B) Establish audit requirements
 that shall be satisfied before a credit certificate may be issued by the California Film Commission.

(C) (i) Establish a procedure for a qualified taxpayer to report to the California Film Commission, prior to the issuance of a credit certificate, the following information:

(I) If readily available, a list of the states, provinces, or other jurisdictions in which any member of the applicant’s combined reporting group in the same business unit as the qualified taxpayer that, in the preceding calendar year, has produced a qualified motion picture intended for release in the United States market. For purposes of this clause, “qualified motion picture” shall not include any episodes of a television series that were complete or in production prior to July 1, 2020.

(II) Whether a qualified motion
 picture described in subclause (I) was awarded any financial incentive by the state, province, or other jurisdiction that was predicated on the performance of primary principal photography or postproduction in that location.

(ii) The California Film Commission may provide that the report required by this subparagraph be filed in a single report provided on a calendar year basis for those qualified taxpayers that receive multiple credit certificates in a calendar year.

(D) Issue a credit certificate to a qualified taxpayer upon completion of the qualified motion picture reflecting the credit amount allocated after qualified expenditures have been verified and the jobs ratio computed under this section. The amount of credit shown on the credit certificate shall not exceed the amount of credit allocated to that qualified taxpayer pursuant to this section.

(4) Obtain, when possible, the following information from applicants that do not receive an allocation of credit:

(A) Whether the qualified motion picture that was the subject of the application was completed.

(B) If completed, in which state or foreign jurisdiction was the primary principal photography completed.

(C) Whether the applicant received any financial incentives from the state or foreign jurisdiction to make the qualified motion picture in that location.

(5) Provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, upon request, any or all application materials or any other materials received from, or submitted by, applicants for which a credit allocation decision has been made, including, but not
 limited to, applicants that did not receive a credit allocation. Materials provided to the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall be in electronic format when available and include, but not be limited to, information provided pursuant to clauses (i) to (xii), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) and the diversity workplans provided pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (k).

(6) The information provided to the California Film Commission pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 19542) of Chapter 7 of Part 10.2.

(7) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after July 1, 2025, the California Film Commission may allocate, pursuant to this section, any previously allocated credits not certified that have not previously been added to credit
 amounts available for allocation under this section or a successor section or sections.

(B) For purposes of this section, “previously allocated credits not certified” means either:

(i) Credits allocated under paragraph (1) for which the qualified taxpayer to which the credit amounts were originally allocated has notified the California Film Commission in writing that the qualified taxpayer will not request certification for the allocated credits.

(ii) The difference between the amount of credits allocated under paragraph (1) to a qualified taxpayer and the amount of credits the California Film Commission certified, for that qualified taxpayer. For purposes of calculating the difference, the California Film Commission shall not consider any credit amounts for which the qualified taxpayer notifies the California Film
 Commission under clause (i).

(8) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after July 1, 2025, the California Film Commission may allocate, pursuant to this section, any credit amounts described in subparagraphs (B) and (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) that have not previously been added to credit amounts available for allocation under this section or a successor section or sections.

(9) The California Film Commission shall submit a report to the Legislature, on an annual basis beginning January 1, 2022, on aggregate diversity information for the productions allocated tax credits allowed in this section and the diversity of the motion picture production industry in California more generally.

(h) (1) The California Film Commission shall annually provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the
 Franchise Tax Board, and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration with a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission. The list shall include the names and taxpayer identification numbers, including taxpayer identification numbers of each partner or shareholder, as applicable, of the qualified taxpayer.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (6) of subdivision (g), the California Film Commission shall annually post on its internet website and make available for public release the following:

(i) A table which includes all of the following information: a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission, the number of production days in California the qualified taxpayer represented in its
 application would occur, the number of California jobs that the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would be directly created by the production, and the total amount of qualified expenditures expected to be spent by the production.

(ii) A narrative staff summary describing the production of the qualified taxpayer as well as background information regarding the qualified taxpayer contained in the qualified taxpayer’s application for the credit.

(iii) For qualified taxpayers allocated a credit, the aggregate diversity information collected pursuant to clauses (iv) and (xii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) organized per production and an aggregate compilation describing the voluntary programs collected pursuant to clause (xiii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(B) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to make the information submitted by an applicant for a tax credit under this section a public record, including for the purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(3) The California Film Commission shall provide each city and county in California with an instructional guide that includes, but is not limited to, a review of best practices for facilitating motion picture production in local jurisdictions, resources on hosting and encouraging motion picture production, and the California Film Commission’s Model Filming Ordinance. The California Film Commission shall maintain on its internet website a list of initiatives by locality that encourage motion picture production in regions across the state. The list shall be distributed to each approved applicant for the program to highlight local
 jurisdictions that offer incentives to facilitate film production.

(i) (1) (A) The aggregate amount of credits that may be allocated for a fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 17053.98, except as provided in subdivision (k) of this section and subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98, is three hundred thirty million dollars ($330,000,000), plus any amount described in subparagraph (B), (C), (D), or (E) in credits for the 2020–21 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, through and including the 2024–25 fiscal year, except as provided in paragraph (7) of subdivision (g), plus the amount described in subparagraph (F) in credits for the 2021–22 and 2022–23 fiscal years.

(B) (i) Subject to clauses (ii) and (iii), the unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year.

(ii) The amount of unused credit allocation attributable to independent films shall only be allocated according to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(iii) The total amount of any unused credit allocation amount that is remaining shall only be allocated pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(C) The amount of previously allocated credits not certified.

(D) The amount of any credits reduced pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(E) That portion of any unused allocation credit amount, if any, attributable to Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 23685, or 23695 available for that fiscal year in a manner as determined by regulations promulgated by the
 California Film Commission.

(F) (i) For fiscal years 2021–22 and 2022–23, the California Film Commission shall allocate an additional fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) in credits to be granted exclusively to television series that relocate to California.

(I) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of this subdivision and clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), the moneys allocated pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be redirected or reallocated.

(II) Notwithstanding paragraph (25) of subdivision (b), for purposes of this subparagraph, a “television series that relocated to California” means a television series, without regard to episode length or initial media exhibition, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per
 episode that both filmed at least 75 percent of principal photography days for at least one episode outside of California and has not filmed more than 25 percent of principal photography days for any episode inside of California.

(ii) For fiscal years 2021–22 and 2022–23, the California Film Commission shall allocate an additional seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) in credits to be granted exclusively to recurring television series.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding the foregoing, and subject to paragraph (4) of this subdivision and changes in allocations pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), the California Film Commission shall allocate the credit amounts subject to the following categories:

(i) Independent films with qualified expenditures of ten million
 dollars ($10,000,000) or less shall be allocated 4.8 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1). Independent films with qualified expenditures in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be allocated 3.2 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1). These amounts shall be in addition to any unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(ii) Features shall be allocated 35 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(iii) A relocating television series shall be allocated 17 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(iv) A new television series, pilots for a new television series, miniseries, and recurring television series shall be allocated 40 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1), plus any unused
 allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(B) Within any allocation period for credits to a relocating television series, any unused amount shall be reallocated to the category described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) and, if any unused amount remains, reallocated in the next allocation period for credits to a relocating television series.

(C) With respect to a relocating television series issued a credit in a subsequent year pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), that subsequent credit amount shall be allowed from the allocation amount described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A).

(3) Any act that reduces the amount that may be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) constitutes a change in state taxes
 for the purpose of increasing revenues within the meaning of Section 3 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and may be passed by not less than two-thirds of all Members elected to each of the two houses of the Legislature.

(4) A qualified motion picture, as defined in subdivision (k), shall not be eligible for an allocation under subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, if it receives a credit under subdivision (k) during that fiscal year.

(j) The California Film Commission shall have the authority to allocate tax credits in accordance with this section and in accordance with any regulations prescribed pursuant to subdivision (e) upon adoption.

(k) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2032, there shall be allowed to a
 qualified taxpayer a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, subject to allocation by the California Film Commission, in an amount equal to:

(A) For credits allocated before July 1, 2025, 20 percent or 25 percent, whichever is the applicable credit percentage described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), as modified by paragraph (3) of this subdivision, of the qualified expenditures for the production of a qualified motion picture produced in the state at a certified studio construction project.

(B) For credits allocated on or after July 1, 2025, 35 percent or 40 percent, whichever is the applicable credit percentage described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 23698.1, as modified by paragraph (3) of this subdivision, of the qualified expenditures for the production of a qualified motion picture produced in the state at a certified studio construction
 project.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the definitions in subdivision (b) shall apply except as otherwise provided in this subdivision.

(A) “Certified studio construction project” means a construction or renovation project certified for a period of five years by the California Film Commission as having met all of the following criteria:

(i) The project provides for the construction or renovation of one or more soundstages located in the state.

(ii) Actual construction or renovation expenditures are not less than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of actual construction or renovation expenditures made over not more than five continuous calendar years.

(iii) The construction
 or renovation of each certified studio construction project is performed in accordance with Section 17053.99.

(iv) The construction or renovation of each certified studio construction project commences pursuant to a foundation permit or a structural building permit for the construction or renovation that is issued after the effective date of the act adopting this subdivision.

(v) The certified studio construction project applicant or its affiliates shall not have received a California Competes Grant under Section 12096.6 of the Government Code for wages or investment related to construction of the studio construction project.

(B) “Qualified motion picture” means a qualified motion picture, as defined in subdivision (b), that meets all of the following requirements:

(i) During the production period, the qualified motion picture films at least 50 percent of its principal photography stage shooting days on a soundstage or soundstages certified as a certified studio construction project.

(ii) During the production period, the qualified motion picture pays or incurs at least five million dollars ($5,000,000) in qualified wages for filming on a soundstage or soundstages certified as a certified studio construction project.

(iii) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2025, is produced by a qualified taxpayer that is either of the following:

(I) More than 50 percent owned, directly or indirectly, by the same owner or owners of the soundstage or soundstages that is part of a certified studio construction project on which the production is filmed.

(II) Entered into a contract or lease of 10 years or more with the owner or owners of a certified studio construction project on which the production is filmed.

(iv) Provides a diversity workplan that is approved by the California Film Commission.

(C) For purposes of this subdivision, a qualified taxpayer and a taxpayer include a passthrough entity and a disregarded entity.

(3) (A) The diversity workplan required pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall include all of the following:

(i) A statement of the diversity goals the motion picture will seek to achieve in terms of qualified wages paid by race, ethnicity, gender, disability status, and
 for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, veteran status.

(ii) A statement of the diversity goals the motion picture will seek to achieve for individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages as set forth in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b), with respect to both compensation and to the representation of diversity in the creative aspects of the motion picture.

(iii) A plan of what strategies the motion picture will employ to achieve the goals in clauses (i) and (ii).

(B) The diversity workplan shall include goals that are broadly reflective of California’s population, in terms of race, ethnicity, gender, disability status, and for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, veteran status. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the
 diversity workplan shall indicate the ZIP Code for those members of the workforce whose wages are qualified expenditures and those whose wages are not qualified expenditures.

(C) The California Film Commission shall approve or reject the diversity workplan of an applicant, to the extent allowed by federal and state law.

(D) (i) The California Film Commission shall not certify any tax credit under this subdivision until they have received a final diversity report from the qualified motion picture applicant.

(ii) The final diversity report shall calculate and provide evidence for the extent to which the applicant met the diversity goals laid out in their diversity workplan.

(iii) The California Film Commission shall have the
 authority to audit the final diversity report to determine if the diversity goals set forth in the applicant’s diversity workplan for the motion picture production were achieved.

(iv) If the California Film Commission determines that the qualified motion picture applicant has met or made a good faith effort to meet the diversity goals in its diversity workplan, the applicant’s credit percentage described in paragraph (1) shall be increased by up to four percentage points as follows:

(I) By two percentage points if the California Film Commission determines that the applicant has met or made a good faith effort to meet the diversity goals with respect to the diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant in its diversity workplan statement.

(II) By two percentage points if the California Film Commission
 determines that the applicant has met or made a good faith effort to meet the diversity goals with respect to individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages as set forth in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b), in its diversity workplan statement.

(E) The California Film Commission, in consultation with the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, shall establish guidelines to evaluate diversity workplans as described in this paragraph. The guidelines shall be posted on the California Film Commission’s internet website.

(4) The credit allowed under this subdivision shall be administered in accordance with subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), (h), and (l), except that paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not apply, paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) shall not apply, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) shall not apply.

(5) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (3), and paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (g) shall apply.

(6) A conflict between this subdivision and any other subdivisions in this section shall be reconciled in favor of this subdivision.

(7) The aggregate amount of credit allocated by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, of this section and Section 17053.98 shall not be reduced by the tax credit allowed pursuant to this subdivision. The amount of credit allowed by this subdivision shall not be limited by subdivision (i).

(8) (A) The credit allocated pursuant to this subdivision shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the California Film
 Commission issues a credit certificate in accordance with the procedures provided for in subdivision (g) for the qualified motion picture. The California Film Commission shall issue a credit certificate to a qualified taxpayer upon completion of the qualified motion picture reflecting the credit amount allocated after qualified expenditures have been verified.

(B) The California Film Commission, commencing with fiscal year 2021–22, shall allocate tax credits each year to qualified motion pictures meeting the criteria of this subdivision. The total amount of credits that may be allocated under this subdivision is one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000). For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2025, the amount of credit that may be allocated to a qualified motion picture under this subdivision shall not exceed the greater of twelve million dollars ($12,000,000), or seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) per episode, for a
 season of a television series. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of credit that may be allocated to a qualified motion picture under this subdivision shall not exceed the greater of twenty-one million dollars ($21,000,000) or one million three hundred thousand dollars ($1,300,000) per episode, for a season of a television series. Recurring television series receiving an initial allocation under this subdivision shall be allocated for subsequent seasons no more than allowed under this paragraph.

(C) In any year the tax credits under this paragraph have been allocated by the California Film Commission, a qualified motion picture or a recurring television series that satisfies the criteria of this subdivision, but have not received an allocation of credits, may apply to receive an allocation of credits pursuant to subdivision (i).

(D) A qualified
 motion picture that satisfies the criteria of this subdivision, other than a recurring television series described in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph, that does not receive a credit allocation under this subdivision because the total amount of credits authorized for the program in subparagraph (B) has been allocated or the qualified motion picture commenced production during the sixth year the certified studio construction project has been certified by the California Film Commission, or any year thereafter, may apply for a credit allocation under subdivisions (a) through (j), inclusive, subject to the jobs ratio enhancement in subclause (II) of clause (iv) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(E) A recurring television series that satisfies the criteria of this subdivision and that is no longer eligible for a credit allocation under this subdivision for a reason described in subparagraph (D) shall receive a credit
 allocation under subdivisions (a) through (j), inclusive, pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(F) Credits shall be allocated based on the assumption that the motion picture meets the diversity criteria specified in clause (iv) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3).

(G) If any successor tax credit program that modifies or replaces the program specified in subdivisions (a) through (j), inclusive, of this section or Section 17053.98 is enacted, both of the following shall apply:

(i) A qualified motion picture described in subparagraph (D) may apply to receive an allocation of credits under the successor program.

(ii) A recurring television series described in subparagraph (E) shall receive an allocation of credits
 under the successor program.

(9) A qualified motion picture meeting the requirements of this subdivision that receives a credit allocation during the five-year period the certified studio construction project is certified by the California Film Commission shall be allowed a credit under this subdivision for subsequent seasons for the life of that recurring television series as long as the qualified motion picture continues to satisfy the criteria of this subdivision and to the extent the total credit amount the California Film Commission is permitted to allocate pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) has not previously been allocated.
